Washington statutes.
RCW 35.107.005

Findings—Intent.

The legislature finds that the cost of developing high quality, commercial office space is prohibitive in cities located outside of a major metropolitan area. The legislature finds these cities plan to locate commercial office space within those urban centers. The legislature also finds that solely planning for commercial office space within urban centers is inadequate and an incentive should be created to stimulate commercial office space development in urban centers outside major metropolitan areas. The legislature intends to provide these cities with local options to incentivize the development of commercial office space in urban centers with access to transit, transportation systems, and other amenities.

[ 2019 c 273 s 1.]